District of Columbia statutes.
38-701

Textbooks and supplies furnished without charge.

(a)

The Board of Education shall issue to each student of the public elementary schools, public junior high schools, and public senior high schools textbooks, workbooks, and adequate instructional materials for each core curriculum subject, free of charge, by the second week of each new semester. The Superintendent shall certify to the Board of Education, within 30 days of each new semester, that each student has been issued textbooks, workbooks, and adequate instructional materials for each core curriculum subject, free of charge.

(b)

The Board of Education shall evaluate and certify every 5 years that all textbooks used in the public school system meet the Board of Education’s goals and objectives and the curriculum framework established for District of Columbia public schools.

(c)

The Board of Education may require a refundable deposit for textbooks issued to students in grades 7 through 12, to offset costs associated with lost or damaged textbooks. If the Board of Education requires a textbook deposit pursuant to this subsection, the Board of Education shall provide for a refund of the deposit at the conclusion of the relevant semester or school year for which the textbook was issued.

(d)

The Board of Education shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

Jan. 31, 1930, 46 Stat. 62, ch. 32, § 1
June 28, 2002, D.C. Law 14-170, § 2, 49 DCR 4726
School officials profiting from purchase of school supplies, see § 38-902.
1981 Ed., § 31-701.
1973 Ed., § 31-401.
D.C. Law 14-170 rewrote the section which had read:
“The Board of Education of the District of Columbia shall provide pupils of the public elementary schools, public junior high schools, and public senior high schools of the District of Columbia free of charge with the use of all textbooks and other necessary educational books and supplies.”

Section 2 of D.C. Laws 13-167 rewrote the section to read as follows:

“(a) The Board of Education of the District of Columbia shall issue each student of the public elementary schools, public junior high schools, and public senior high schools of the District of Columbia textbooks, workbooks, and adequate instructional materials for each core curriculum subject, free of charge, by the second week of each new semester. The Superintendent shall certify to the Council, within 30 days of each new semester, that each student has been issued textbooks, workbooks, and adequate instructional materials for each core curriculum subject, free of charge.

“(b) The Board of Education shall evaluate and certify every 5 years to the Council that all textbooks used in the public school system meet the Board of Education’s goals and objectives and the curriculum framework established for the District of Columbia’s public schools.

“(c) The Board of Education may require a refundable textbook deposit in grades 7 through 12 to offset costs associated with lost or damaged textbooks. The Board of Education shall provide for refund of any textbook deposit authorized pursuant to this subsection, at the conclusion of the relevant semester or school year for which the textbook was issued. The Board of Education shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section.

“(d) The Public Schools Free Textbook Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 is subject to the availability of appropriated funds, or the Council’s prescription requiring the Superintendent to comply with the law by making funds available within its FY 2001 budget.”

Section 2 of D.C. Laws 13-167 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Public Schools Free Textbook Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-347, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 5006).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Public Schools Free Textbook Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-429, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7456).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Public Schools Free Textbook Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-458, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9432).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Public Schools Free Textbook Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-58, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5695).